en: Salty snacks made from potato
da: Salte snacks lavet af kartoffel
de: Salzige Snacks aus Kartoffeln
es: Aperitivos salados elaborados con patata, Aperitivos salados de patata, Snacks salados de patata, Snacks salados elaborados con patata
fi: Perunasta valmistetut suolaiset naposteltavat
fr: Snacks salés à base de pommes de terre
he: חטיפים מלוחים מתפוח אדמה
hr: Slane grickalice od krumpira
it: snack salati a base di patate
lt: Sūrūs užkandžiai iš bulvių
sv: Salta snacks gjorda på potatis

en: Crisps made from reconstituted potato
fr: Chips de pomme de terre reconstituée

en: Stacked extruded potato crisps
fr: Tuiles de pommes de terre extrudées salées, Tuiles salées, tuile salée, Biscuit apéritif à base de pomme de terre, Tuile salée à base de pomme de terre

en: Corn chips, corn crisps, Tortilla chips
bg: Царевичен чипс
ca: Xips de moresc, Xips de panís
da: Majschips, Tortilla chips
de: Mais-Chips, Tortillachips, Nachos, Maischips
es: Patatas fritas de maíz
fi: maissilastut
fr: Chips de maïs, Chips Tortillas, Tortillas Chips, Tortilla chips, Chips Tortilla
hr: Kukuruzni čips
hu: Kukoricacsipsz
it: Snack al mais
ja: コーンチップス, トルティーヤチップス
lt: Kukurūzų traškučiai, tortilijos traškučiai
nl: Tortillachips
pl: Chrupki kukurydziane, Nachosy, Nachos, Chipsy kukurydziane
ro: Nachos, Chipsuri de porumb, Chipsuri din porumb
ru: Кукурузные чипсы

en: Flavoured corn crisps, Flavoured corn chips, Flavoured tortilla chips
fr: Chips de maïs aromatisées

en: Sweet potato fries
fr: Frites de patate douce

en: Mashed sweet potatoes, Sweet potato puree cooked with cream
fr: Purées de patates douces, Purée de patates douces cuisinée à la crème, Purée de patate douce cuisinée à la crème

en: Potato fries, Fries
bg: Пържени картофи
da: Pomfritter, Pommes frites
de: Pommes Frites
es: Patatas fritas
fi: Ranskanperunat, Ranskalaiset perunat, Ranskalaiset
fr: Frites
hr: Pomfrit
it: Patatine fritte, Patatine a bastoncino
lt: Bulvytės
nl: Friet
sv: Pommes frites
zh: 薯条

en: Potato wedges
ar: بطاطا ودجز
cs: Americké brambory
da: Kartoffelbåde
de: Kartoffelspalten, Kartoffelecken
fi: Lohkoperunat
id: Baji kentang
is: Bátakartöflur
ja: ポテトウェッジズ
jv: Kenthang rajang
ka: მექსიკური კარტოფელი
ko: 웨지감자
ms: Bebaji kentang
ru: Картофель по-деревеiнски
sk: Americké zemiaky
sv: Potatisklyftor, Klyftpotatis
zh: 薯角

xx: Pommes noisettes
bg: Картофени ноазети
da: Pommes château, Pommes noisette
de: Schlosskartoffeln
fr: Pommes noisettes, Pommes de terre noisettes
ja: ポメ・ヌワゼット
nl: Krielaardappel, Pommes parisiennes
sv: Pommes château, Châteaupotatisar, Slottspotatisar

en: Frozen pommes noisettes, Frozen pre-fried mashed potato balls
da: Frosne pommes château
fr: Pommes noisettes surgelées, Pommes de terre noisette surgelées
sv: Frysta pommes château

xx: Pommes dauphines
fr: Pommes dauphines

en: Frozen pommes dauphines, Frozen dauphine potatoes, Frozen cooked dauphine potato
da: Frosne pommes dauphine
fr: Pommes dauphines surgelées, Pomme de terre dauphine surgelée, Pomme de terre dauphine cuite surgelée
hr: Smrznuti dauphine krumpir
lt: Šaldytos dauphine bulvės

en: Frozen duchesse potatoes, Frozen cooked duchesse potato
da: Frosne duchesse-kartofler
fr: Pommes duchesses surgelées, Pomme de terre duchesse surgelée, Pomme de terre duchesse cuite surgelée
sv: Frysta duchessepotatisar

en: Takeaway potato fries, Takeaway fries
da: Takeaway-pomfritter
sv: Takeaway-pommes frites

fr: Sardines frites
nl: Minifriet

en: Dairies, Dairy, Milk products, Dairy products
af: Suiwelproduk
ar: منتجات`الألبان
az: Süd məhsulları
be: Малочныя прадукты
bg: Млечни продукти, Млечен продукт
bn: দুগ্ধজাত পণ্য
br: Boued-laezh
bs: Mliječni proizvodi
ca: Productes làctics, Làctic
cs: Mléčné výrobky, Mléčný výrobek
cy: Cynnyrch llaeth
da: Mælkeprodukter, Mejeriprodukter
de: Milchprodukte, Milcherzeugnis
el: Γαλακτοκομικά προϊόντα
eo: Laktoprodukto
es: Lácteos, Productos lácteos, Lácteo
et: Piimatoode
eu: Esneki
fa: فراورده لبنی
fi: Maitotuotteet, Maitotuote
fr: Produits laitiers, produit laitier, laitage, laitages, crèmerie, crèmeries
fy: Suvel
gl: Produtos lácteos
he: מוצרי חלב, מַחלָבָה
hi: दुग्ध-उत्पाद
hr: mliječni proizvodi
hu: Tejtermékek, Tejtermék
hy: Կաթնամթերք
id: Produk susu
is: Mjólkurafurð
it: Latticini, prodotti caseari
ja: 乳製品
kk: Сүт тағамдары
kn: ಕ್ಷೀರೋತ್ಪನ್ನ
ko: 유제품
lt: Pieno produktai, Pieno produktas
lv: Piena produkti
mn: Сүүн бүтээгдэхүүн
ms: Produk tenusu
nl: Zuivelproducten, Melkproducten, Zuivelproduct, Zuivel
no: Meieriprodukter, Melkeprodukter
oc: Produch lachièr
pa: ਡੇਅਰੀ ਉਤਪਾਦ
pl: Nabiał, Produkty mleczne
pt: laticínios, lacticínios
ro: Produse lactate, lactate
ru: Молочные продукты
si: ගව කිරි ආශ්‍රිත නිෂ්පාදන
sl: Mlečni izdelek
sr: Млечни производи
sv: Mejeriprodukt, Mejeriprodukter, Mjölkprodukter
ta: பால் பொருள்
th: ผลิตภัณฑ์จากนม, ผลิตภัณฑ์นม
tr: Mandıra ürünü
uk: Молочні продукти
ur: ڈیری مصنوعات
uz: Sut mahsulotlari
vi: Chế phẩm sữa
yi: מילכיגס
zh: 乳製品, 奶制品

en: Dairy variety packs
de: Milchproduktemischpackungen
es: Paquetes variados de productos lácteos
fr: Assortiments de produits laitiers
hr: Različita pakiranja mliječnih proizvoda
it: Confezioni miste di latticini
nl: Zuivelproductassortimenten
pt: Packs variados de laticínios

en: Fermented milk products, Cultured dairy foods, Cultured dairy products, Cultured milk products
bg: Ферментирали млечни продукти
ca: Productes làctics fermentats
da: Fermenterede mælkeprodukter
de: Fermentierte Milch, Sauermilchprodukte
es: Productos fermentados de la leche
fi: Hapatetut maitotuotteet
fr: Produits laitiers fermentés
he: מוצרי מזון מותססים, מוצרים חלביים
hr: Fermentirani mliječni proizvodi
hu: Fermentált tejtermékek, Erjesztett tejtermékek
it: Prodotti lattiero-caseari fermentati, Alimenti caseari fermentati, Prodotti a base di latte fermentato, Prodotti caseari fermentati, latticini fermentati
lt: Rauginti pieno produktai, Kultūriniai pieno produktai
nl: Gefermenteerde zuivelproducten
no: Fermenterte melkeprodukter, Kultiverte meieriprodukter
pl: Fermentowane produkty mleczne
pt: Produtos lácteos fermentados
ru: Кисломолочные продукты
sv: Fermenterade mjölkprodukter
th: กลุ่มผลิตภัณฑ์นมเปรี้ยว
tr: Fermente süt ürünleri
zh: 发酵乳制品, 发酵乳制食品

en: Fermented milk drinks
bg: Ферментирали млечни напитки
ca: Begudes de llet fermentada
de: Fermentierte Milchgetränke
es: Bebidas de leche fermentada
fi: Hapatetut maitojuomat
fr: Boissons lactées fermentées
hr: Fermentirani mliječni napici
hu: Erjesztett tejitalok
it: Bevande al latte fermentate
ja: 発酵乳
lt: Rauginto pieno gėrimai
nl: Gefermenteerde zuiveldranken
pt: Bebidas lácteas fermentadas
ru: Кисломолочные напитки
tr: Fermente sütlü içecekler